Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2116
License; issued upon passing examination and showing satisfactory qualifications.

Any person having been examined and having submitted satisfactory evidence that he or she is qualified to undertake and perform work in his or her trade or skill, to the end that any such work will be safely and properly accomplished and installed in accordance with approved standards, based upon minimum standards adopted by the board pursuant to section 81-2104 for such work, shall be licensed as provided in the State Electrical Act.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-587;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 15.